District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

7-1302.01

Determination of need for mental retardation facilities and services in the District.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 201, 25 DCR 5094
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 506 (c), 42 DCR 3684

Cross References

Rights of mentally retarded citizens, commitment proceedings, see § 7-1304.01.
Rights of mentally retarded citizens, effective date of chapter, see § 7-1306.05.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1911.
1973 Ed., § 6-1653.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 505(c) of Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Temporary Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 10-253, March 23, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1652).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary repeal of section, see § 505(c) of the Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Emergency Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-389, December 29, 1994, 42 DCR 197).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 506(c) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).

Transfer of Functions

The functions of the Department of Transportation were transferred to the Department of Public Works by Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984.

The functions of the Department of General Services were transferred, in part, to the Department of Public Works by Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984, and transferred, in part, to the Department of Administrative Services by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984.